Utah statutes.
78B-2-305.   Within three years.
An action may be brought within three years:
(1)  for waste, trespass upon, or injury to real property; except that when
waste or trespass is committed by means of underground works upon any mining
claim, the cause of action does not accrue until the discovery by the
aggrieved party of the facts constituting the waste or trespass;
(2)  for taking, detaining, or injuring personal property, including actions
for specific recovery; except that in cases where the subject of the action is
a domestic animal usually included in the term "livestock," which at the time
of its loss has a recorded mark or brand, if the animal strayed or was stolen
from the true owner without the owner's fault, the cause does not accrue until
the owner has actual knowledge of facts that would put a reasonable person
upon inquiry as to the possession of the animal by the defendant;
(3)  for relief on the ground of fraud or mistake; except that the cause of
action does not accrue until the discovery by the aggrieved party of the facts
constituting the fraud or mistake;
(4)  for a liability created by the statutes of this state, other than for a
penalty or forfeiture under the laws of this state, except where in special
cases a different limitation is prescribed by the statutes of this state; or
(5)  to enforce liability imposed by Section 78B-3-603, or for damages under
Section 78B-6-1701, except that the cause of action does not accrue until the
aggrieved party knows or reasonably should know of the harm suffered.
